src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns

!! hobune
hobune:hobu N-hobune  "" ;
rebane:reba N-hobune  "" ;

!! redel
redel:redel N-redel "" ;
traktor:traktor N-redel "" ;

!! redel-A
aatom:aatom N-redel "" ;
aamen:aamen N-redel "" ;
aatrium:aatrium N-redel "" ;
abdoomen:abdoomen N-redel "" ;
abituurium:abituurium N-redel "" ;
absorber:absorber N-redel "" ;
adapter:adapter N-redel "" ;
adiantum:adiantum N-redel "" ;
